Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-1232
Bridge commission; bridges; control and management.

The commission shall operate, manage, and control the bridges under its charge in their entirety, fix the rate of tolls, establish bylaws and rules and regulations for the use and operation of such bridges, provide for the lighting and policing thereof, and select such employees as it deems necessary and fix their compensation, and if and when authorized by the governing body of the city shall have power to renew, replace, reconstruct, extend and enlarge bridges, but shall not have power to create liens upon or to mortgage any property unless first authorized by the governing body of the city.

Laws 1929, c. 176, § 14, p. 625;

C.S.1929, § 14-1214;

Laws 1931, c. 27, § 3, p. 113;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 14-1214;

R.S.1943, § 14-1232.